District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-303

Perpetuities—Chattels real.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1024
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 403, 48 DCR 2087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-303.
1973 Ed., § 45-103.